Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 2 Organization and Command of Military and Naval Forces

30-2-1.
Commander-in-chief.

The governor shall be the captain general and commander-in-chief of the military and naval forces of the state, except when they shall be called into the service of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 15; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-1

.

30-2-2.
Staff of commander-in-chief.

There shall be a staff of the commander-in-chief. The staff shall consist of:

The adjutant general who shall be chief of staff, commanding general of the Rhode Island army and air national guard, and paymaster general with the rank not to exceed that of major general;

The assistant adjutant general who shall be assistant chief of staff;

One state judge advocate who shall be an officer of the organized militia; and

Eight (8) aides-de-camp who shall be detailed by the commander-in-chief from the commissioned officers of the national guard or naval militia, in active or retired service; provided, however, the commander-in-chief may appoint as five (5) of the eight (8) aides-de-camp honorably discharged commissioned officers, who were in the military or naval services of the United States in time of war; or commissioned officers with the rank of their commissions therein, of the armed forces reserve of the United States or the retired list of officers of the regular armed forces of the United States; and, provided, further, that, when the national guard is absent from the state in the active military service of the United States, the commander-in-chief, in his or her discretion, may detail as aides-de-camp commissioned officers of the state guard, but in no event shall the total number of aides-de-camp on the staff of the commander-in-chief exceed eight (8). Officers detailed from the national guard, the naval militia, or the state guard, shall have the rank of their commissions in the national guard, naval militia, or state guard and shall not be relieved from duty with their organizations during their term of office on the staff of the commander-in-chief. Honorably discharged commissioned officers appointed as aides-de-camp by the commander-in-chief shall have the same rank as they held at the time of their discharge from the military or naval service of the United States or of any higher rank to which they are entitled at the time of their appointment. All aides-de-camp shall hold office during the term of office of the commander-in-chief or at his or her pleasure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 16; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-2

; P.L. 1961, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 64, § 1.

30-2-3.
Rules and regulations.

The governor may make and publish all necessary rules and regulations and issue such orders as may be necessary for the organization, discipline, government, training, and use of the militia of the state and they shall have the force and effect of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 17; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-3

.

30-2-4.
Approval of vouchers.

The governor shall not be required to sign or approve vouchers provided for in chapters 1 — 14 of this title; provided, however, that nothing contained in this section shall apply to payments required to be made for expenses and payment of the militia when ordered into service under the provisions of §

30-2-6

; and provided, further, that the governor shall have notified the controller, in writing, of his or her desire to avail himself or herself of the provisions of this section, such notification to be effective until withdrawn.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 18; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-4

.

30-2-5.
Declaration of martial law.

In case of war, invasion, rebellion, insurrection, riot, tumult, public calamity or catastrophe, or other emergency, or imminent danger thereof, or resistance to the laws of this state, or the United States, the governor may, if in his or her judgment the maintenance of law and order and the protection of person and property will thereby be promoted, by proclamation, declare the state, or any part thereof, to be under martial law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 19; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-5

.

30-2-6.
Order of militia into service.

In case of martial law, war, invasion, rebellion, insurrection, riot, tumult, public calamity or catastrophe, or other emergency, or imminent danger thereof, or resistance to the laws of this state, or the United States, the governor shall order into service all or any part of the militia that he or she may deem necessary, to serve until the exigencies shall have passed. If the occasion be so sudden that the governor cannot be informed and his or her orders received and executed, the adjutant general may order into service all or any part of the militia, with like powers and authority as are herein conferred on the governor.

In the event of a request for assistance from the state of Rhode Island or an agency thereof, the governor may order into service all or part of the militia that he or she may deem necessary, to serve for the purposes of providing assistance and support for official state functions, or other state activities for training.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 20; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-6

; P.L. 2001, ch. 126, § 1.

30-2-7.
Call of boards of officers.

The governor, whenever in his or her opinion it shall be necessary, may call boards of officers for settling military questions or for other purposes relative to good order and discipline.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 21; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-7

.

30-2-8.
Appointment of temporary officers.

Whenever the exigencies of the service require, the governor may appoint such additional officers, with rank not exceeding that of colonel, as may be actually necessary to perform the duties required, and these officers shall receive the same pay and allowances as are allowed officers of similar rank in the national guard; provided, however, that whenever the exigency ceases to exist, the officers appointed under this chapter shall be mustered out of service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 22; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-8

.

30-2-9.
Power of governor over organization within militia.

The governor may organize, alter, increase, divide, annex, consolidate, reorganize, disband, or decrease any unit, organization, staff corps, and department whenever, in his or her judgment, the efficiency of the state militia will be thereby increased, or to make the state conform to any table of organization or system of training prescribed by the laws of the United States, or the rules or regulations prescribed thereunder for the organization and training of the national guard.

For that purpose, the number of commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted men in any unit, organization, staff corps, and department may be increased or diminished and the grades of these commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted men may be altered to the extent necessary to conform thereto.

No organization of the national guard shall be disbanded, nor its minimum strength reduced, except in conformity with the laws of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 23; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-9

.

30-2-10.
Order of militia into service to meet federal call.

Whenever the militia, or any part thereof, is called, ordered, or drafted under the Constitution and laws of the United States, the governor shall order for this service the national guard, the naval militia, if organized, and if the number available is insufficient, he or she shall order out such other part of the militia as may be necessary.

Upon the termination of an emergency, all persons drafted for the emergency as national guard when discharged from federal service shall resume their membership in the national guard. These persons shall continue to serve in the national guard until the dates upon which their enlistment entered into prior to the draft would have expired, if uninterrupted, under regulations to be prescribed by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 24; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-10

.

30-2-11.
Order of militia into service for training.

The governor may order or authorize the militia, or any portion thereof, to perform military duty of every description and to participate, either within or without the state, in drills, instruction, target practice, practice marches, camps of instruction, encampments, maneuvers, assemblages, conferences, schools, or competitions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 25; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-11

.

30-2-12.
Adjutant general — Appointment and duties.

There shall be an adjutant general with rank not to exceed that of lieutenant general. The adjutant general shall be appointed by the governor and shall hold office for a term of four (4) years from the time of appointment and until his or her successor shall be appointed in his or her place and stead; provided, however, that this appointment may be revoked by the governor for cause or if the adjutant general shall have been found to be physically unfit for service, as provided by §

30-3-22

. The first appointment under this section shall be made on the first Tuesday of January, 1967, or within ten (10) days thereafter, and subsequent appointments shall be made during the similar period in each fourth year thereafter. By virtue of his or her office, the adjutant general shall be the chief of staff to the governor and the commanding general of the Rhode Island army and air national guard; he or she shall be subordinate to only the governor in matters pertaining to the military and naval affairs of the state. The adjutant general shall perform such duties as may be required by chapters 1 — 14 and any other law of the state, and such other duties as pertain to the adjutant general under the regulations and customs of the United States Department of Defense and the laws of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 30; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-12

; P.L. 1966, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 64, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 196, § 1.

30-2-13.
Qualifications of adjutant general.

No person shall be eligible to hold the office of adjutant general unless he or she holds, or has held, a commission of at least colonel in the armed forces of the United States, or in a reserve component thereof, and shall have served not less than five (5) years in one or more of the federal services, and shall meet the criteria for federal recognition in the rank to which he or she has been appointed as prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 30; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-13

; P.L. 1966, ch. 229, § 2; P.L. 1969, ch. 64, § 3.

30-2-14.
Bond of adjutant general.

The governor shall require the adjutant general to give bond to the state in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the governor, to faithfully discharge the duties of his or her office as adjutant general. The costs of the bond are to be paid for by state funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 30; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-14

.

30-2-15.
Seal of office.

The adjutant general shall have a seal of office approved by the governor, and all papers and copies thereof in the military division of the executive department duly certified and authenticated under that seal shall be evidence in like manner as if the original were produced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 30; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-15

.

30-2-16.
Assistant adjutants general.

There shall be two (2) assistant adjutants general with rank not to exceed that of brigadier general, one of whom shall be detailed by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, from the federally recognized officers, or from the retired officers, of the Rhode Island army national guard, and one of whom shall be detailed by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, from the federally recognized officers, or from the retired officers, of the Rhode Island air national guard; provided, however, that, when the Rhode Island national guard is in the active military service of the United States, there shall be only one assistant adjutant general, who shall be detailed by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, from the officers of the Rhode Island state guard. These assistant adjutants general shall hold office at the pleasure of the adjutant general and shall serve as commanding officers for Rhode Island code of military justice purposes. They shall perform such duties as may be assigned to them by the adjutant general in addition to their other duties in the national guard, if any. In the absence from the state of the adjutant general, the assistant adjutant general detailed from the army national guard shall be authorized to perform all duties provided by law or regulation for the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 14; P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 31; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-16

; P.L. 1973, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 63, § 1.

30-2-17.
Quartermaster.

The governor shall appoint, designate, or detail, upon recommendation of the adjutant general, subject to the approval of the secretary of defense, an officer of the national guard who shall be regarded as property and fiscal officer of the United States, and state property officer. He or she shall receipt and account for all funds and property belonging to the United States in possession of the national guard and shall make such returns and reports concerning the funds and property as may be required by the Secretary of Defense.

The United States property and fiscal officer shall be designated as the state quartermaster and shall issue and be held accountable for, under the adjutant general, all state military property and shall make such property returns and reports of the military property as the adjutant general may direct.

The governor shall require the state quartermaster to give bond to the state in such sum as the governor may require and with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the governor to faithfully discharge the duties of the office of the state quartermaster. The costs of the bond is to be paid for by state funds.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary to compensate the property and fiscal officer, provided that no person receiving annual compensation from the state for other service shall be paid as property and fiscal officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 35; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-17

.

30-2-18.
Annual report of adjutant general.

The adjutant general shall annually make a report of the militia to the general assembly at its January session, and also present a copy of the report to the governor on or before the first day of January or at such other time as he or she shall direct. The report shall contain a detailed account of all moneys appropriated by the state and expended for the militia, and also, as far as such details are available to him or her, of all other money expended for the militia from whatever sources these moneys may be derived, and showing all these sources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 32; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-18

.

30-2-19.
Care of military property — Annual inventory — Rental of armories.

The adjutant general shall attend to the care, preservation, and repairing of the arms, ammunition, equipment, clothing, and all other military property belonging to the state, except insofar as this duty has been reposed in the department of administration. He or she shall annually make an inventory of the military property of the state and present a copy of the inventory to the governor on or before the first day of January, or at such other times as the governor shall direct. The inventory shall show, in detail, the disposition of all arms, ammunition, equipment, clothing, and other military property on hand or issued. The adjutant general is hereby empowered to rent armories in this state for periods not exceeding two (2) weeks rent free or for whatever rental and conditions and for whatever purpose the adjutant general, in his or her sole discretion, shall deem proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 33; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-19

; P.L. 1970, ch. 151, § 1.

30-2-20.
Annual inspection of armories and property.

The adjutant general shall annually cause to be made an inspection of the armories of the militia, and of the arms, equipments, uniforms, and other property in the possession of the militia.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 34; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-20

.

30-2-21.
Seniority list of officers.

The adjutant general shall, as part of his or her annual report, annually publish a list showing the seniority of officers, with the dates of their commissions or warrants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 36; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-21

.

30-2-22.
Publication of laws and regulations — Forms, stationery, and postage.

The adjutant general may, when necessary, cause the militia laws and regulations of the state, together with such parts of the Constitution, laws, and regulations of the United States, as relate thereto, as he or she deems necessary, to be prepared, procured, printed, and distributed to the officers of the militia and shall also prepare, procure, and issue all printing, stationery, blank books, blanks, forms, notices, and postage, required to carry into effect the provisions of chapters 1 — 14 of this title and the proper administration of the militia. All books, blanks, stationery, and postage issued by the adjutant general shall be receipted for by the officer receiving them, to be held or accounted for by him or her as public property. In the event of the removal from office of the receipting officer, this property, when required by the adjutant general, shall be delivered to his or her successor, returned to the adjutant general, or otherwise satisfactorily accounted for.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 37; G.L. 1956, §

30-2-22

.